test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_C_makizin_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - C - mkizin :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     mkizin+NI: mkizin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+mkizin+NI: nmakzin
     2+mkizin+NI: gmakzin
     3+mkizin+NI: makzin
     X+mkizin+NI: makzin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mkizin+NI+Con: mkiznenh
     mkizin+NI+Dim: mkiznens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     mkizin+NI+Pej: mkiznish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     mkizin+NI+Prt: mkizniba
     mkizin+NI+Voc+Pl: mkiznidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     mkizin+NI+4: mkiznan
     mkizin+NI+Loc: mkizning
     mkizin+NI+Pl: mkiznan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+mkizin+NI+Con: nmakzinenh
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim: nmakzinens
     2+mkizin+NI+Con: gmakzinenh
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim: gmakzinens
     3+mkizin+NI+Con: makzinenh
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim: makzinens
     X+mkizin+NI+Con: makzinenh
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim: makzinens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos: nmakzinim
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos: gmakzinim
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos: makzinim
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos: makzinim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+mkizin+NI+Pej: nmakzinish
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej: gmakzinish
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej: makzinish
     X+mkizin+NI+Pej: makzinish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+mkizin+NI+1+Pl: nmakzinnaa
     2+mkizin+NI+1+Pl: gmakzinnaa
     2+mkizin+NI+2+Pl: gmakzinwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+2+Pl: makzinwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+3+4: makzinni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+mkizin+NI+Prt: nmakzinba
     1+mkizin+NI+Voc+Pl: nmakzindig
     2+mkizin+NI+Prt: gmakzinba
     2+mkizin+NI+Voc+Pl: gmakzindig
     3+mkizin+NI+Prt: makzinba
     3+mkizin+NI+Voc+Pl: makzindig
     X+mkizin+NI+Prt: makzinba
     X+mkizin+NI+Voc+Pl: makzindig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+4: nmakzinan
     1+mkizin+NI+Loc: nmakzining
     1+mkizin+NI+Pl: nmakzinan
     2+mkizin+NI+4: gmakzinan
     2+mkizin+NI+Loc: gmakzining
     2+mkizin+NI+Pl: gmakzinan
     3+mkizin+NI+4: makzinan
     3+mkizin+NI+Loc: makzining
     3+mkizin+NI+Pl: makzinan
     X+mkizin+NI+4: makzinan
     X+mkizin+NI+Loc: makzining
     X+mkizin+NI+Pl: makzinan
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mkizin+NI+Con+Pej: mkiznenyish
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej: mkiznensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     mkizin+NI+Con+Prt: mkiznenyba
     mkizin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: mkiznenydig
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt: mkiznensba
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: mkiznensdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     mkizin+NI+Con+4: mkiznenyin
     mkizin+NI+Con+Loc: mkiznenying
     mkizin+NI+Con+Pl: mkiznenyin
     mkizin+NI+Dim+4: mkiznensan
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Loc: mkiznensing
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Pl: mkiznensan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     mkizin+NI+Pej+Prt: mkiznishba
     mkizin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: mkiznishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     mkizin+NI+Pej+4: mkiznishan
     mkizin+NI+Pej+Loc: mkiznishing
     mkizin+NI+Pej+Pl: mkiznishan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     mkizin+NI+Prt+4: mkiznibniin
     mkizin+NI+Prt+Loc: mkiznibniing
     mkizin+NI+Prt+Pl: mkiznibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos: nmakzinenyim
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos: nmakzinensim
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos: gmakzinenyim
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos: gmakzinensim
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos: makzinenyim
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos: makzinensim
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos: makzinenyim
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos: makzinensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej: nmakzinenyish
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej: nmakzinensish
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej: gmakzinenyish
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej: gmakzinensish
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej: makzinenyish
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej: makzinensish
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej: makzinenyish
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej: makzinensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl: nmakzinenynaa
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl: nmakzinensnaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+1+Pl: gmakzinenynaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl: gmakzinenywaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+1+Pl: gmakzinensnaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl: gmakzinenswaa
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+2+Pl: makzinenywaa
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+3+4: makzinenyni
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+2+Pl: makzinenswaa
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+3+4: makzinensni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt: nmakzinenyba
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: nmakzinenydig
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt: nmakzinensba
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: nmakzinensdig
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt: gmakzinenyba
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: gmakzinenydig
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt: gmakzinensba
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: gmakzinensdig
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt: makzinenyba
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: makzinenydig
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt: makzinensba
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: makzinensdig
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Prt: makzinenyba
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: makzinenydig
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt: makzinensba
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: makzinensdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+4: nmakzinenyin
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Loc: nmakzinenying
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pl: nmakzinenyin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+4: nmakzinensan
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Loc: nmakzinensing
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pl: nmakzinensan
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+4: gmakzinenyin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Loc: gmakzinenying
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pl: gmakzinenyin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+4: gmakzinensan
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Loc: gmakzinensing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pl: gmakzinensan
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+4: makzinenyin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Loc: makzinenying
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pl: makzinenyin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+4: makzinensan
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Loc: makzinensing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pl: makzinensan
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+4: makzinenyin
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Loc: makzinenying
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+Pl: makzinenyin
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+4: makzinensan
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Loc: makzinensing
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pl: makzinensan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej: nmakzinmish
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej: gmakzinmish
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej: makzinmish
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej: makzinmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmakzinminaa
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmakzinminaa
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmakzinmiwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl: makzinmiwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+3+4: makzinmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt: nmakzinmiba
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmakzinmidig
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt: gmakzinmiba
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmakzinmidig
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt: makzinmiba
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: makzinmidig
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Prt: makzinmiba
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: makzinmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+4: nmakzinman
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Loc: nmakzinming
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pl: nmakzinman
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+4: gmakzinman
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Loc: gmakzinming
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pl: gmakzinman
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+4: makzinman
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Loc: makzinming
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pl: makzinman
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+4: makzinman
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Loc: makzinming
     X+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pl: makzinman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+mkizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl: nmakzin'shinaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+1+Pl: gmakzin'shinaa
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+2+Pl: gmakzin'shiwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+2+Pl: makzin'shiwaa
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+3+4: makzin'shini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+mkizin+NI+Pej+Prt: nmakzin'shiba
     1+mkizin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmakzin'shidig
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+Prt: gmakzin'shiba
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmakzin'shidig
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+Prt: makzin'shiba
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: makzin'shidig
     X+mkizin+NI+Pej+Prt: makzin'shiba
     X+mkizin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: makzin'shidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Pej+4: nmakzin'shan
     1+mkizin+NI+Pej+Loc: nmakzin'shing
     1+mkizin+NI+Pej+Pl: nmakzin'shan
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+4: gmakzin'shan
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+Loc: gmakzin'shing
     2+mkizin+NI+Pej+Pl: gmakzin'shan
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+4: makzin'shan
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+Loc: makzin'shing
     3+mkizin+NI+Pej+Pl: makzin'shan
     X+mkizin+NI+Pej+4: makzin'shan
     X+mkizin+NI+Pej+Loc: makzin'shing
     X+mkizin+NI+Pej+Pl: makzin'shan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+Prt: nmakzinnaanba
     1+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakzinnaandig
     2+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+Prt: gmakzinnaanba
     2+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinnaandig
     2+mkizin+NI+2+Pl+Prt: gmakzinwaaba
     2+mkizin+NI+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakzinwaadig
     3+mkizin+NI+2+Pl+Prt: makzinwaaba
     3+mkizin+NI+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makzinwaadig
     3+mkizin+NI+3+4+Prt: makzinniwba
     3+mkizin+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl: makzinniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+4: nmakzinnaanin
     1+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+Loc: nmakzinnaaning
     1+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+Pl: nmakzinnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+4: gmakzinnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+Loc: gmakzinnaaning
     2+mkizin+NI+1+Pl+Pl: gmakzinnaanin
     2+mkizin+NI+2+Pl+4: gmakzinwaan
     2+mkizin+NI+2+Pl+Loc: gmakzinwaang
     2+mkizin+NI+2+Pl+Pl: gmakzinwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+2+Pl+4: makzinwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+2+Pl+Loc: makzinwaang
     3+mkizin+NI+2+Pl+Pl: makzinwaan
     3+mkizin+NI+3+4+4: makzinniwan
     3+mkizin+NI+3+4+Loc: makzinniing
     3+mkizin+NI+3+4+Pl: makzinniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Prt+4: nmakzinbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Prt+Loc: nmakzinbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Prt+Pl: nmakzinbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Prt+4: gmakzinbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Prt+Loc: gmakzinbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Prt+Pl: gmakzinbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Prt+4: makzinbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Prt+Loc: makzinbaniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Prt+Pl: makzinbaniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Prt+4: makzinbaniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Prt+Loc: makzinbaniing
     X+mkizin+NI+Prt+Pl: makzinbaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: mkiznenyshiba
     mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: mkiznenyshidig
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: mkiznensshiba
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: mkiznensshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+4: mkiznenyshan
     mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: mkiznenyshing
     mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: mkiznenyshan
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+4: mkiznensshan
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: mkiznensshing
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: mkiznensshan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+4: mkiznenybaniin
     mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: mkiznenybaniing
     mkizin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: mkiznenybaniin
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: mkiznensbaniin
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: mkiznensbaniing
     mkizin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: mkiznensbaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     mkizin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: mkiznishbaniin
     mkizin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: mkiznishbaniing
     mkizin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: mkiznishbaniin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej: nmakzinenymish
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: nmakzinensmish
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej: gmakzinenymish
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: gmakzinensmish
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej: makzinenymish
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: makzinensmish
